Maryland, session 2025, HB0094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
24–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Program” means an Opioid–Associated Disease Prevention and Outreach
Program.
24–902.
(a) (1) A Program may be established by a local health department or a
community–based organization, subject to the provisions of this subtitle.
– 1 –

Ch. 27 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) (i) A county may cooperate with another county to establish a
Program.
(ii) A community–based organization may establish a multicounty
Program.
(3) This subtitle does not apply to the AIDS Prevention Sterile Needle and
Syringe Exchange Pilot Program established under Subtitle 8 of this title.
(b) (1) (i) A local health department or community–based organization
shall apply to the Department and a local health officer for authorization to operate a
Program.
(ii) A local health department or community–based organization
may apply at any time for authorization to operate a Program under subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph.
(2) The Department and a local health officer jointly shall issue an
authorization determination based on the ability of a Program to meet the requirements of
this subtitle.
(3) The Department and a local health officer shall:
(i) Approve or deny an application for authorization to operate a
Program within 60 days after receiving a complete application; and
(ii) Provide to the applicant a written explanation of the decision of
the Department and local health officer.
(4) (i) A local health department or community–based organization
may appeal an adverse decision by the Department and a local health officer to the
[Deputy] Secretary [for Public Health Services] OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE.
(ii) The [Deputy] Secretary OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE
shall:
1. Grant or deny an appeal within 60 days after receiving an
appeal; and
2. Provide a written explanation of the [Deputy] Secretary’s
OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE’S decision to the local health department or
community–based organization.
(c) If established under subsection (a) of this section, a Program shall:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 27
(1) Provide for substance use outreach, education, and linkage to treatment
services to participants, including distribution and collection of hypodermic needles and
syringes; and
(2) Operate in accordance with:
(i) The technical assistance of the Standing Advisory Committee;
and
(ii) The procedures, plans, and protocols approved by:
1. The local health officer for each county in which a Program
is established; and
2. The Department.
24–904.
(a) The Department shall appoint a Standing Advisory Committee on
Opioid–Associated Disease Prevention and Outreach Programs.
(b) The Standing Advisory Committee shall consist of:
(1) The [Deputy] Secretary [for Public Health Services] OR THE
SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE;
(2) One individual from academia who specializes in public health issues
related to substance–related disorders or infectious diseases;
(3) One representative from law enforcement, nominated by the Executive
Director of the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and Policy;
(4) One individual with expertise in the prevention of HIV or viral
hepatitis;
(5) One health care practitioner with experience providing services to
individuals who inject drugs;
(6) One individual with substance use experience;
(7) One family member of an individual who injects or has injected drugs;
(8) One representative of local law enforcement;
(9) One local health officer;
– 3 –

Ch. 27 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(10) One representative of a local or regional hospital;
(11) One individual with experience in syringe services programs; and
(12) Any additional members recommended by the Department.
(c) The [Deputy] Secretary [for Public Health Services] OR THE SECRETARY’S
DESIGNEE shall serve as chair of the Standing Advisory Committee.
(d) The Standing Advisory Committee shall:
(1) Provide technical assistance to each Program on developing:
(i) Program operating procedures for collection and distribution of
hypodermic needles and syringes;
(ii) A plan for community outreach and education; and
(iii) A protocol for linking Program participants to substance–related
disorder treatment and recovery services; and
(2) Make recommendations to a Program regarding any aspect of Program
procedures or operation.
24–905.
(a) The Department shall:
(1) Adopt regulations for the implementation of this subtitle, in
consultation with the Standing Advisory Committee and the Maryland Association of
County Health Officers; and
(2) Ensure the provision of technical assistance to a Program about best
practices, best practice protocols, and other subject areas.
(b) The regulations adopted under subsection (a)(1) of this section shall establish:
(1) Procedures for ensuring the security of Program locations and
equipment;
(2) An appeals process for appeals authorized by § 24–902(b)(4) of this
subtitle, including the standard of review that the [Deputy] Secretary [for Public Health
Services] OR THE SECRETARY’S DESIGNEE must apply when reviewing a decision of the
Department and a local health officer; and
(3) Procedures for data collection and Program evaluation.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 27
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 5 –